src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON reflobl
!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Loc.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Loc.
+Acc:ieža%> PxV ;
+Gen:ieža%> PxV ;
+Acc+Err/Orth-a-á:iežá%> PxV ;
+Gen+Err/Orth-a-á:iežá%> PxV ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:ieza%> PxV ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:ieza%> PxV ;
+Acc+PxPl2+Err/Orth:ieža%>dehpet K ;
+Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:ieža%>dehpet K ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>n# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:ieža%>m9# NAMAT ;  ! !SOUTH
!+Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>t# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>s# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>me# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>de# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>ska# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>met# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>det# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>set# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:iehča%> Px1V ;
+Gen+Use/NG:iehča%> Px1V ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>n# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>me# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>met# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlstem ;
+Gen+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlstem ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeame# NAMAT ;     !
!+Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeatte# NAMAT ;     !
!+Gen+PxDu3+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeaskka# NAMAT ; !
!+Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeamet# NAMAT ;     !
!+Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeattet# NAMAT ; !
!+Gen+PxPl3+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeaset# NAMAT ;     !
+Ill:alcce%>s PxC ; ! All generated Ill forms here
+Ill+Err/Orth:alcce%>sii K ; ! All generated Ill forms here
+Ill+Use/NG:alcca%> Px1V ;
+Ill+Use/NG:alcca%> Px2V ;
+Ill+Use/NG:alcci%> Px3V ;
+Ill+Use/NG:alcce%> PxV ;
+Ill+Use/NG:alla%>s PxC ;
+Ill+PxSg1+Err/Orth:allasim9# K ; ! !SOUTH
+Loc:alddi%> PxVvowch ;
+Loc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:aldda%>n K ;
+Loc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:aldda%>t K ;
+Loc+Use/NG:aldde%> Px3V ;
+Loc+Use/NG:aldde%>st PxC ;
+Loc+Err/Orth:alddi%>n PxCPlstem ; !
+Loc+Use/NG:alddi%>jn PxCPlstem ;
+Loc+Use/NG:alddá%>n PxCPlstem ;
+Loc+PxSg1+Err/Orth:ieža%>stan# K ;
+Loc+PxSg1+South+Err/Orth:ieža%>stam# K ;  ! !SOUTH
+Loc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:ieža%>stat# K ;
+Loc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:ieža%>stis# K ;
+Com:ieža%>jn PxC ;
+Com+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlCom ;
+Com+Err/Orth:ieža%>jn PxCPlCom ;
+Ess:iehča%>n PxC ;

LEXICON refloblalt
!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Loc.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Loc.
+Acc:ieža%> PxV ;
+Gen:ieža%> PxV ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>n# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:ieža%>m9# NAMAT ;  ! !SOUTH
!+Gen+PxSg2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>t# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxSg3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>s# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>me# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>de# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>ska# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>met# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl2+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>det# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl3+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:ieža%>set# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:iehča%> Px1V ;
+Gen+Use/NG:iehča%> Px1V ;
!+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>n# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>me# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:iehča%>met# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlstem ;
+Gen+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlstem ;
!+Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeame# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeatte# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxDu3+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeaskka# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeamet# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeattet# NAMAT ;
!+Gen+PxPl3+Err/Orth:ieža%>jdeaset# NAMAT ;
+Com+Use/NG:ieža%>jn PxC ;
+Com+Use/NG:ieža%>jd PxCPlCom ;
+Com+Use/NG:ieža%>jn PxCPlCom ;
+Ess+Use/NG:iehča%>n PxC ;


LEXICON PxCPlstem
!This lexicon is here since it only applies to Reflexives.
!It handles the exeptional AG and Loc DuPl plural stem forms of ieš.
+PxDu1:eame K ;
+PxDu2:eatte K ;
+PxDu3:easkka K ;
+PxDu3+Err/Orth:easka K ;
+PxPl1:eamet K ;
+PxPl2:eattet K ;
+PxPl3:easet K ;


LEXICON PxCPlCom ! +Use/NG
! This lexicon for archaic biblical forms like iežaideasetguin.
+PxDu1+Use/NG:eameguin K ;
+PxDu2+Use/NG:eatteguin K ;
+PxDu3+Use/NG:easkkaguin K ;
+PxPl1+Use/NG:eametguin K ;
+PxPl2+Use/NG:eattetguin K ;
+PxPl3+Use/NG:easetguin K ;





! Reciprocal pronouns
! -------------------


LEXICON GOABBATLEX
+Du+Use/-PLX:goabbat # ;
+Pl+Use/-PLX:guhtet # ;
+Du+Err/Orth:goappat # ; ! ! Dialectal forms. Norm?
+Pl+Err/Orth:guđet # ;   ! ! Dialectal forms. Norm?

LEXICON GUOIBMILEX
+Sg+Acc+Use/-PLX:guoibmá Px1VRecipr ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:guoibmá Px1VRecipr ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/-PLX:guoimmi Px23VRecipr ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:guoimmi Px23VRecipr ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/-PLX:guoimmi Px3VPlStem ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:guoibmá Px3VPlStem ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:guoimmi Px3VPlStem ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:guoibmá Px3VPlStem ;
+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:guoibmás PxCPlstem ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/-PLX:guoimmist PxCPlstem ;
+Sg+Com+Use/-PLX:guimmiin PxCPlstem ;

+Pl+Acc+Use/-PLX:guimmiid PxCPlstem ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/-PLX:guimmiid PxCPlstem ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/-PLX:guimmiidasa PxVPlRecipr ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/-PLX:guimmiin PxCPlstem ;
+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:guimmiin PxCPlComRecipr ;
+Pl+Com+Use/-PLX:guimmiid PxCPlComRecipr ;

LEXICON GOABBATGUOIBMILEX
+Acc:goabbat% guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Gen:goabbat% guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Acc:goabbat% guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Gen:goabbat% guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Acc:goabbat% guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen:goabbat% guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill:goabbat% guoibmás PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Loc:goabbat% guoimmist PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Com:goabbat% guimmiin PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoibmás PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guoimmist PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:goabbat∑#guimmiin PxDUCPlRecipr ;

LEXICON GOAPPATGUOIBMILEX
+Acc:goappat% guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Gen:goappat% guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Acc:goappat% guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Gen:goappat% guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Acc:goappat% guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen:goappat% guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill:goappat% guoibmás PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Loc:goappat% guoimmist PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Com:goappat% guimmiin PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoibmá PxDU1VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoimmi PxDU23VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoimmi PxDU3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoibmás PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guoimmist PxDUCPlRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:goappat∑#guimmiin PxDUCPlRecipr ;

LEXICON GUHTETGUOIBMILEXsg
+Acc:guhtet% guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Gen:guhtet% guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Acc:guhtet% guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Gen:guhtet% guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:guhtet% guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:guhtet% guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Acc:guhtet% guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen:guhtet% guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill:guhtet% guoibmás PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Loc:guhtet% guoimmist PxPLCPlRecipr ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoibmás PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guoimmist PxPLCPlRecipr ;

LEXICON GUHTETGUOIBMILEXpl
+Acc:guhtet% guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Gen:guhtet% guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Ill:guhtet% guimmiidasa PxPLVPlRecipr ;
+Loc:guhtet% guimmiin PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Com+Err/Orth:guhtet% guimmiin PxPLCPlComRecipr ;
+Com:guhtet% guimmiid PxPLCPlComRecipr ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiidasa PxPLVPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiin PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiin PxPLCPlComRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:guhtet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlComRecipr ;

LEXICON GUDETGUOIBMILEXsg
+Acc:guđet% guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Gen:guđet% guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Acc:guđet% guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Gen:guđet% guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Acc:guđet% guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen:guđet% guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:guđet% guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/Orth:guđet% guoibmá PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill:guđet% guoibmás PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Loc:guđet% guoimmist PxPLCPlRecipr ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoibmá PxPL1VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoimmi PxPL23VRecipr ;
+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoimmi PxPL3VPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoibmás PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guoimmist PxPLCPlRecipr ;

LEXICON GUDETGUOIBMILEXpl
+Acc:guđet% guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Gen:guđet% guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Ill:guđet% guimmiidasa PxPLVPlRecipr ;
+Loc:guđet% guimmiin PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Com:guđet% guimmiid PxPLCPlComRecipr ;
+Com+Err/Orth:guđet% guimmiin PxPLCPlComRecipr ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiidasa PxPLVPlRecipr ;
+Loc+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiin PxPLCPlRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiid PxPLCPlComRecipr ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:guđet∑#guimmiin PxPLCPlComRecipr ;

LEXICON NUBBILEX
+Gen:nuppi%>id nubbiPxDu ;
+Acc:nuppi%>id nubbiPxDu ;
+Ill:nuppi%>idasa Px1VRecipr ;
+Loc:nuppi%>in nubbiPxDu ;
+Com:nuppi%>id nubbiPxDuCom ;

+Gen:nuppi%>id nubbiPxPl ;
+Acc:nuppi%>id nubbiPxPl ;
+Ill:nuppi%>idasa Px23VRecipr ;
+Ill:nuppi%>idasa Px3VPlStem ;
+Loc:nuppi%>in nubbiPxPl ;
+Com:nuppi%>id nubbiPxPlCom ;

LEXICON NUBBIRESLEX
+Du+Gen:nubbi% nuppi K ;
+Du+Acc:nubbi% nuppi K  ;
+Du+Ill:nubbi% nubbái K ;
+Du+Loc:nubbi% nuppis K ;
+Du+Com:nubbi% nuppiin K ;
+Du+Ess:nubbi% nubbin K ;
+Pl+Gen:nuppit% nuppi%>id9  K  ;
+Pl+Acc:nuppit% nuppi%>id9  K  ;
+Pl+Ill:nuppit% nuppi%>ide  K  ;
+Pl+Loc:nuppit% nuppi%>in  K  ;
+Pl+Com:nuppit% nuppi%>iguin  K  ;
+Pl+Ess:nuppit% nubbin K ;


LEXICON Px1VRecipr
+Du1:me K ;
+Pl1:met K ;


LEXICON PxDU1VRecipr
+Du1:me K ;

LEXICON PxPL1VRecipr
+Pl1:met K ;

LEXICON Px23VRecipr
!LEXICON Px2VPlStem     !SUB
+Du2:X2de K ;
+Pl2:X2det K ;

LEXICON PxDU23VRecipr
+Du2:X2de K ;

LEXICON PxPL23VRecipr
+Pl2:X2det K ;

LEXICON Px3VPlStem
+PxDu3:ska K ;
+PxPl3:set K ;


LEXICON PxDU3VPlRecipr
+Du3:ska K ;

LEXICON PxPL3VPlRecipr
+Pl3:set K ;


LEXICON PxVPlRecipr
+Du1:me K ;
+Du2:de K ;
+Du3:ska K ;
+Pl1:met K ;
+Pl2:det K ;
+Pl3:set K ;

LEXICON PxPLVPlRecipr
+Pl1:met K ;
+Pl2:det K ;
+Pl3:set K ;

LEXICON PxCPlComRecipr
+Du1:eameguin K ;
+Du2:eadeguin K ;
+Du3:easkkaguin K ;
+Pl1:eametguin K ;
+Pl2:eattetguin K ;
+Pl3:easetguin K ;


LEXICON PxPLCPlComRecipr
+Pl1:eametguin K ;
+Pl2:eattetguin K ;
+Pl3:easetguin K ;

LEXICON PxDUCPlRecipr
+Du1:eame K ;
+Du2:eatte K ;
+Du3:easkka K ;
+Du3+Err/Orth:easka K ;

LEXICON PxPLCPlRecipr
+Pl1:eamet K ;
+Pl2:eattet K ;
+Pl3:easet K ;


LEXICON nubbiPxDu
+PxDu1:eame K ;
+PxDu2:eatte K ;
+PxDu3:easkka K ;
+PxDu3+Err/Orth:easka K ;

LEXICON nubbiPxPl
+PxPl1:eamet K ;
+PxPl2:eattet K ;
+PxPl3:easet K ;

LEXICON nubbiPxDuCom
+PxDu1:eameguin K ;
+PxDu2:eatteguin K ;
+PxDu3:easkkaguin K ;

LEXICON nubbiPxPlCom
+PxPl1:eametguin K ;
+PxPl2:eattetguin K ;
+PxPl3:easetguin K ;




! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------
